Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.520

Criminal acts and penalties.

It shall be a misdemeanor:

(1) For any person to violate any provision of this chapter or any provision of any marketing agreement or order duly issued by the director pursuant to this chapter.

(2) For any person to wilfully render or furnish a false or fraudulent report, statement, or record required by the director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or any provision of any marketing agreement or order duly issued by the director pursuant to this chapter or to wilfully fail or refuse to furnish or render any such report, statement, or record so required.

(3) For any person engaged in the wholesale or retail trade to fail or refuse to furnish to the director or his or her designee or his or her duly authorized agents, upon request, information concerning the name and address of the person from whom he or she has received an agricultural commodity regulated by a marketing agreement or order in effect and issued pursuant to the terms of this chapter and the grade, standard, quality, or quantity of and the price paid for such commodity so received.

Every person convicted of any such misdemeanor shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars or by imprisonment of not less than ten days nor more than six months or by both such fine and imprisonment. Each violation during any day shall constitute a separate offense: PROVIDED, That if the court finds that a petition pursuant to RCW 15.65.570 was filed and prosecuted by the defendant in good faith and not for delay, no penalty shall be imposed under subsection (1) of this section for such violations as occurred between the date upon which the defendant's petition was filed with the director and the date upon which notice of the director's decision thereon was given to the defendant in accordance with RCW 15.65.570 and regulations prescribed pursuant thereto.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6088; 1961 c 256 s 52.]